fr: Maison et jardin > Linge > Linge de table: Serviettes en tissu; Napperons; Sets de table; Chemins de table; Jupes de table; Nappes
pl: Dom i ogród > Bielizna stołowa i pościelowa > Bielizna stołowa: Serwetki; Serwety; Maty stołowe; Bieżniki; Falbany stołowe; Obrusy
vi: Nhà và vườn > Vải lanh và bộ đồ giường > Khăn trải bàn và phụ kiện bằng vải: Khăn ăn; Khăn bàn nhỏ; Tấm lót bàn ăn; Dây trải giữa bàn trang trí; Tấm phủ bàn trang trí; Khăn trải bàn
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Articole textile și lenjerie de pat > Articole textile pentru masă: Șervete de masă; Milieuri; Naproane; Traverse pentru masă; Decorațiuni masă; Fețe de masă
th: บ้านและสวน > ผ้าปูที่นอนและของใช้บนเตียง > ผ้าที่ใช้กับโต๊ะ: ผ้าเช็ดปาก; แผ่นรองอาหารและภาชนะ; ที่รองจาน; ผ้าคาดโต๊ะ; ผ้าปิดขาโต๊ะ; ผ้าปูโต๊ะ
ru: Дом и сад > Кухонный текстиль, постельные принадлежности и полотенца > Кухонный текстиль: Тканевые салфетки; Ажурные салфетки; Салфетки для сервировки; Настольные дорожки; Юбки для столов; Скатерти
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > テーブルリネン・寝具 > テーブルリネン: ナプキン; ドイリー; ランチョンマット; テーブルランナー; テーブルスカート; テーブルクロス
en: Home & Garden > Linens & Bedding > Table Linens: Cloth Napkins; Doilies; Placemats; Table Runners; Table Skirts; Tablecloths
es: Casa y jardín > Ropa de casa > Mantelería: Servilletas de tela; Tapetes de ganchillo; Manteles individuales; Tapetes; Faldas para mesas; Manteles
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Yatak Çarşaf ve Nevresimleri > Keten Masa Örtüleri: Kumaş Peçeteler; Dantel Parçaları; Amerikan Servisler; Masa Runnerları; Masa Etekleri; Masa Örtüleri
nb: Hjem og hage > Lakner og sengetøy > Duker: Kjøkkenservietter; Spisebrikker; Bordbrikker; Bordløpere; Bordskjørt; Bordduker
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Obliečky a posteľná bielizeň > Obrusy: Látkové obrúsky; Háčkované obrusy; Prestierania; Behúne na stôl; Ozdobné lemy na stoly; Utierky
de: Heim & Garten > Bett- und Haushaltswäsche > Tischwäsche: Stoffservietten; Zierdecken; Tischsets; Tischläufer; Tischvorhänge; Tischtücher
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Lençóis e roupas de cama > Roupas de mesa: Guardanapos de pano; Guardanapos decorativos; Jogo americano de mesa; Caminhos de mesa; Saias de mesa; Toalhas de mesa
nl: Huis en tuin > Linnengoed > Tafellinnen: Stoffen servetten; Onderleggers; Placemats; Tafellopers; Tafelrokken; Tafelkleden
cs: Dům a zahrada > Prádlo > Stolní prádlo: Látkové kapesníky; Háčkované ubrousky; Prostírání; Běhouny na stůl; Rautové sukně; Ubrusy
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Домашен текстил и спално бельо > Текстил за маса: Текстилни салфетки; Дантелени салфетки; Подложки за хранене; Тишлайфери за маса; Драперия за маса; Покривки за маса
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 리넨 제품/침구 > 식탁용 리넨: 천 냅킨; 도일리; 테이블 매트; 테이블 러너; 테이블 스커트; 식탁보
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Patalynė ir baltiniai > Stalo baltiniai: Medžiaginės servetėlės; Nertos servetėlės; Stalo padėkliukai; Juostinės staltiesės; Stalo sijonai; Staltiesės
hu: Otthon és kert > Textíliák és ágyneműk > Asztaltextílek: Szövetszalvéták; Csipkés terítők; Terítékek; Asztali futók; Asztali szoknyák; Asztalterítők
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 床包被套 > 桌布: 餐巾; 桌巾/餐墊; 餐墊; 狹長桌巾; 桌裙; 桌巾
sv: Hem och trädgård > Linne och sängkläder > Bordslinne: Tygservetter; Tallriksunderlägg och tabletter; Bordstabletter; Bordslöpare; Bordskjolar; Bordsdukar
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Posteljno perilo in posteljnina > Pogrinjki za mizo: Serviete iz blaga; Papirnati podstavki; Podloge za mizo; Namizni tekači; Namizne zavesice; Namizni prti
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Liina- ja vuodevaatteet > Pöytäkankaat: Kangasservetit; Pitsiliinat; Tabletit; Kaitaliinat; Helmaliinat; Pöytäliinat
da: Hjem og have > Linned og sengetøj > Dækketøj: Stofservietter; Mellemlægsservietter; Dækkeservietter; Bordløbere; Bordskørter; Bordduge
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Atoalhados e roupa de cama > Atoalhados: Guardanapos de tecido; Naperons; Individuais; Caminhos de mesa; Saias para mesa; Toalhas de mesa
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Λευκά είδη & κλινοσκεπάσματα > Επιτραπέζια λευκά είδη: Υφασμάτινες χαρτοπετσέτες; Δαντελωτά τραπεζομάντιλα; Σουπλά; Στενόμακρα διακοσμητικά τραπεζομάντηλα; Υφασμάτινα διακοσμητικά καλύμματα τραπεζιού; Τραπεζομάντηλα
it: Casa e giardino > Biancheria > Teli per la tavola: Fazzoletti in tessuto; Centrini; Tovagliette; Guide da tavolo; Gonne per tavoli da buffet; Tovaglie
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Posteljina i krevetnina > Stolno rublje: Platnene salvete; Tabletići; Podmetači za jelo; Nadstolnjaci; Suknje za stol; Stolnjaci
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 床上用品 > 餐桌用布: 餐巾布; 花边桌垫; 餐垫; 桌旗; 台裙; 台布